Utah statutes.
72-4-125.   State highways -- SR-191, SR-193, SR-196 to SR-200.

State highways include:

(1)  SR-191.  From the Utah-Arizona state line south of Bluff northerly through Blanding, Monticello, and Moab to Route 70 at Crescent Junction; then beginning again from Route 6 north of Helper northerly through Indian Canyon to Route 40 at Duchesne; then beginning again from Route 40 at Vernal northerly through Greendale Junction and Dutch John to the Utah-Wyoming state line.

(2)  SR-193.  From Route 126 in Clearfield east through the south entrance to Hill Air Force Base to Route 89.

(3)  SR-196.  From Route 199 near the control gate at Dugway Proving Grounds northerly via the Skull Valley Road to the west bound on and off ramps of Route 80 at the Rowley Junction Interchange.

(4)  SR-197.  From Route 73 northerly on Fifth West Street to Route 89 in Lehi.

(5)  SR-198.  From Route 15 northbound ramps of the North Santaquin Interchange northeasterly through Spring Lake, to 100 North in Payson; then easterly and northeasterly through Salem to 300 South in Spanish Fork; then easterly and southeasterly to Route 6 at Moark Junction.

(6)  SR-199.  From Route 196 north of the Dugway Proving Grounds main gate northeasterly through Clover to Route 36.

(7)  SR-200.  From Route 61 in Lewiston, approximately three miles west of Route 91, north to the Utah-Idaho state line.

